Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3206.01
Authority; sale of real property; notification to adjacent real property owner required.

No authority created pursuant to section 77-3201 shall offer for sale any parcel of real property without notifying, in writing, each owner of adjacent real property, on record, that the authority intends to offer such parcel for sale. The notice shall include the legal description of such parcel and shall be mailed at least forty-five days before the parcel is offered for sale.

Laws 2008, LB710, § 1.